Rhode Island, session 2025, SB778.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-3 of the General Laws entitled "Property Subject to Taxation" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-3-70. Imposition of tax on higher education private institution endowments.
(a) There is hereby imposed a tax upon the endowment of a private institution of higher
education with an endowment in excess of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000). This tax shall be
in an amount equal to two percent (2%) upon each dollar or dollar value within the endowment in
excess of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000).
(b) All tax revenues collected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be deposited
into a restricted receipt account.
(c) The funds in the restricted receipt account shall be disbursed to the municipality where
the private institution of higher education is situated. These funds shall be used expressly to hire,
retain, and support behavioral health staff within the public schools of the municipality, which staff
shall include, but not be limited to, social workers, school psychologists, and behavioral health
specialists.
(d) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Endowment” means a fund or source of funds, much of which consists of donations
of money or property to the private institution of higher education, which uses the resulting
investment income for a purpose, or to be used for operations or programs of the private institution.
(2) “Situated” means the municipality where the private institution is predominantly

located or maintains a majority of its physical buildings including, but not limited to, a campus.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000820
========
LC000820 - Page 2 of 3